North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-06 Department of Human Services
50-06-06.15.
Mental health program registry.

The department shall establish and maintain a registry of mental health programs in the state. A mental health program shall provide the information and documentation necessary to the department at least annually in the form and manner prescribed by the department. The department shall make the registry available to the public on the department’s website.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 360, § 1, effective April 21, 2021.

50-06-07.
Office and office equipment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 37.

50-06-08.
Executive director and employees — Appointment — Compensation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 37.

50-06-09.
Executive director — Qualifications — Term of office. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 37.

50-06-10.
Executive director — Oath of office — Bond. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 37.

50-06-11.
Reciprocal agreements by department.

The department, with the approval of the attorney general, may:

Enter into reciprocal agreements with corresponding state agencies of other states having like statutory authority, regarding the interstate residence, care, and transportation of indigent persons.

Arrange with the proper officials in this state for:

The acceptance, transfer, and support of persons receiving any form of public aid or relief or likely to become a public charge in other states; and

The acceptance, transfer, and support of persons from another state receiving any form of public aid or relief or likely to become a public charge in this state, in accordance with the terms of the reciprocal agreement with other states.

Source:

S.L. 1939, ch. 196, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 50-0611.

Law Reviews.

Uniform Laws in North Dakota, 27 N.D. L. Rev. 313 (1951).

50-06-12.
Human service zone bound by reciprocal agreements of department — Duty of state and human service zone when person determined not entitled to support.

Any agreement made by the department under the provisions of section 50-06-11 for the acceptance, transfer, and support of any person from another state is binding on the human service zone where such person is residing. Neither this state nor any human service zone in this state shall be committed to the support of any person who is held by the department not to be entitled to public support under the laws of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1939, ch. 196, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 50-0612; 2019, ch. 391, § 87, effective January 1, 2020.

50-06-13.
Biennial report to governor and office of management and budget. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 37.

50-06-14.
Financing of welfare programs. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 221, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 50-0614; S.L. 1959, ch. 372, § 65; 1963, ch. 200, § 17; 1965, ch. 181, § 20; 1971, ch. 466, § 7; repealed by 2021, ch. 356, § 2, effective April 23, 2021.

50-06-14.1.
Limitation on state reimbursement for rental expenses of long-term care facilities. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services shall limit the reimbursement for rental expense paid by a provider of services when a provider sells its skilled nursing facility, intermediate care facility, basic care facility, or other facility furnishing care to its residents, when a care rate is based, in part, upon property costs unique to that facility, to a third party who leases the facility back to the provider. The department’s reimbursement for rental expense may not exceed the lesser of the rental expense paid by the provider or the cost of ownership of the facility. The cost of ownership includes depreciation, interest, real estate taxes, and other expenses properly related to the facility. The department of human services shall apply this limit to rates set for each facility’s first fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 1985, but shall consider, in setting such rates, all sales occurring on or after July 18, 1984.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 523, § 1; 1989, ch. 317, § 5.

50-06-14.1.
Limitation on state reimbursement for rental expenses of long-term care facilities. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department shall limit the reimbursement for rental expense paid by a provider of services when a provider sells its skilled nursing facility, intermediate care facility, basic care facility, or other facility furnishing care to its residents, when a care rate is based, in part, upon property costs unique to that facility, to a third party who leases the facility back to the provider. The department’s reimbursement for rental expense may not exceed the lesser of the rental expense paid by the provider or the cost of ownership of the facility. The cost of ownership includes depreciation, interest, real estate taxes, and other expenses properly related to the facility. The department shall apply this limit to rates set for each facility’s first fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 1985, but shall consider, in setting such rates, all sales occurring on or after July 18, 1984.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 523, § 1; 1989, ch. 317, § 5; 2021, ch. 352, § 390, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-14.2.
Department to establish reasonable rates. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 2, § 28.

50-06-14.3.
Department of human services to develop basic care facility ratesetting methodology. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 428, § 3.

50-06-14.4.
Alzheimer’s and related dementia and twenty-four-hour care projects. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 424, § 1.

50-06-15.
Confidentiality of information contained in records — Penalty.

Individually identifiable information concerning an individual applying for or receiving assistance or services under any program administered by or under the supervision and direction of the department is confidential, except that any such information, including an individual’s social security number, may be used and disclosed:

In the administration of any such program;

In accordance with a program’s participation in the department’s master client index data matching system, unless prohibited by federal law;

As specifically authorized by the rules of the department; or

As permitted or required by other law.

A vendor, agent, or contractor of the department must agree to maintain the confidentiality of individually identifiable information disclosed to that person by the department or by any individual applying for or receiving assistance or services and may use and disclose confidential information only to the extent that person’s agreement with the department permits the use and disclosure of any such information.

As used in this section, “individually identifiable information” means information, including an individual’s name, address, telephone number, facsimile number, social security number, electronic mail address, program identification number, or any other unique identifying number, characteristic, or code, as well as demographic information collected from an individual, that:

Is created or received by the department; and

Relates to:

The past, present, or future assistance or services applied for or received by an individual under any program administered by or under the supervision and direction of the department that identifies the individual or with respect to which there is a reasonable basis to believe the information can be used to identify the individual; or

A report, or any other information obtained, concerning an applicant or a provider of or an individual applying for or receiving assistance or services under any program administered by or under the supervision and direction of the department.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, a report concerning an applicant or a provider of or an individual applying for or receiving assistance or services under any program administered by or under the supervision and direction of the department, as well as any other information obtained, is confidential if the report is made in good faith, and may be disclosed to:

Authorized staff of the department and its authorized agents who further may disclose to persons who have a definite interest in the well-being of the adults or children concerned, who are in a position to serve their interests, and who need to know the contents of the records to assure the well-being and interests of the adults or children concerned.

Any person who is the subject of the report; provided, however, that the identity of the persons reporting or supplying information under this chapter is protected until the information is needed for use in an administrative or legal proceeding arising out of the report.

Public officials and their authorized agents who require the information in connection with the discharge of their official duties.

A court, including an administrative hearing officer, when the court determines the information is necessary for the determination of an issue before the court.

A person engaged in a bona fide research purpose approved by the department’s institutional review board; provided, however, that no individually identifiable information as defined in subsection 3 is made available to the researcher unless the information is absolutely essential to the research purpose and the department gives prior approval.

Any person who discloses, authorizes, or knowingly permits, participates in, or acquiesces in the disclosure of any confidential information in violation of this section is subject to the penalty provided in section 12.1-13-01.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 451, § 1; 2005, ch. 408, § 1; 2009, ch. 411, § 1; 2013, ch. 369, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 369, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 411, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

Collateral References.

Privileged communications: communications to social worker as privileged, 50 A.L.R.3d 563.

50-06-15.1.
Exchange and transfer of patient records.

The department shall implement a procedure for the exchange and transfer, among treatment units within the department and treatment units of agencies under contract with the department, of records relating to the examination, custody, care, and treatment of mental health clients receiving services supported by public funds, subject to standards for confidentiality. The department shall adopt, in accordance with chapter 28-32, rules necessary to implement this section.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 573, § 1.

50-06-16.
Rulemaking authority.

The department may adopt rules necessary to carry out the responsibilities of the department in conformity with any statute administered or enforced by the department. All rules adopted must be published in the North Dakota Administrative Code. Rules adopted by agencies prior to January 1, 1982, which relate to functions or agencies covered by this chapter remain in effect until such time as they are specifically amended or repealed. The department is not required to adopt rules to establish the process for the administration of funds appropriated to the department in an appropriation identified by the legislative assembly as a one-time funding item.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 8; 1989, ch. 575, § 5; 1995, ch. 457, § 4; 2015, ch. 12, § 12, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 12 of chapter 46, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

50-06-17.
Biennial report — Budget estimates.

The department shall submit to the governor and the office of management and budget the biennial report and budget estimate in accordance with sections 54-06-04 and 54-44.1-04.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 7; 1989, ch. 575, § 6; 1995, ch. 457, § 5.

50-06-18.
Developmental disabilities service providers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 231, § 3.

50-06-19.
Exemption from insurance premium tax.

No tax otherwise due under section 26.1-03-17 may be required of a stock or mutual insurance company, nonprofit health service corporation, or health maintenance organization with respect to service fees collected by any third-party administrator providing administrative services or premiums, capitation payments, or policy fees paid by the department for coverage or services provided to a recipient of benefits.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 407, § 1; 2001, ch. 420, § 1.

50-06-20.
Programs funded at state expense — Interpretation.

The state shall bear the cost, in excess of the amount provided by the federal government, of:

As provided in section 50-24.1-14, medical assistance services provided under chapter 50-24.1;

Energy assistance program benefits provided under subsection 18 of section 50-06-05.1;

Supplements provided under chapter 50-24.5 as basic care services;

Services, programs, and costs listed in section 50-09-27;

Welfare fraud detection programs;

Human services provided by the human service zones or the department;

General assistance under chapter 50-01;

Special projects approved by the department and agreed to by any affected human service zone; and

Programs and services unique to the human service zone which have been included in the approved human service zone plan.

The state shall bear the costs of amounts expended for service payments for elderly and disabled and expanded service payments for elderly and disabled.

This section does not grant any recipient of services, benefits, or supplements identified in subsection 1, any service, benefit, or supplement that a recipient could not claim in the absence of this section.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 403, § 10; 2015, ch. 329, § 5, effective January 1, 2016; 2017, ch. 331, § 8, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 353, § 9, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 391, § 88, effective January 1, 2020.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 329, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2015.

Note.

Section 50-06-20 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 9 of Chapter 353, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2039; and Section 8 of Chapter 331, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 1136.

50-06-20.1.
Human services grant program — Eligible counties — Reports. [Repealed]

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 329, § 6, effective May 13, 2015; 2017, ch. 341, § 16, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 341, § 6, effective August 1, 2019; repealed by 2019, ch. 391, § 138, effective July 1, 2019.

50-06-21.
Gambling disorder prevention, awareness, crisis intervention, rehabilitation, and treatment services. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services shall contract with qualified treatment service providers for the development and implementation of a program for gambling prevention, awareness, crisis intervention, rehabilitation, financial counseling, and mental health treatment services. The program may provide outpatient services, partial care services, aftercare services, intervention services, financial counseling services, consultation services, or other forms of preventive, rehabilitative, or treatment services for individuals with a gambling disorder. An individual who provides treatment services must be a licensed professional operating within the individual’s scope of practice. An individual who provides financial counseling services must be a certified consumer credit counselor with an accredited financial counseling agency. The department of human services may establish a sliding payment scale for services under the program. The department of human services may establish a centrally located repository of educational materials on identifying and treating gambling disorders. Any service fee collected by qualified treatment service providers for services provided under the contract must be applied toward the program’s gambling disorder services. The term “qualified treatment service provider” means an entity based in North Dakota which is experienced in and capable of delivering gambling disorder education, prevention, awareness, crisis intervention, rehabilitation, financial counseling, and mental health treatment services as defined by the department of human services. The term “gambling disorder” means a chronic, progressive disease that is characterized by a preoccupation with gambling, loss of control over gambling behaviors, and oftentimes disregard for the negative consequences as a result of gambling. Gambling disorder includes gambling behavior that compromises, disrupts, or damages personal, family, or vocational pursuits.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 460, § 2; 2001, ch. 421, § 1; 2017, ch. 352, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

50-06-21.
Gambling disorder prevention, awareness, crisis intervention, rehabilitation, and treatment services. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department shall contract with qualified treatment service providers for the development and implementation of a program for gambling prevention, awareness, crisis intervention, rehabilitation, financial counseling, and mental health treatment services. The program may provide outpatient services, partial care services, aftercare services, intervention services, financial counseling services, consultation services, or other forms of preventive, rehabilitative, or treatment services for individuals with a gambling disorder. An individual who provides treatment services must be a licensed professional operating within the individual’s scope of practice. An individual who provides financial counseling services must be a certified consumer credit counselor with an accredited financial counseling agency. The department may establish a sliding payment scale for services under the program. The department may establish a centrally located repository of educational materials on identifying and treating gambling disorders. Any service fee collected by qualified treatment service providers for services provided under the contract must be applied toward the program’s gambling disorder services. The term “qualified treatment service provider” means an entity based in North Dakota which is experienced in and capable of delivering gambling disorder education, prevention, awareness, crisis intervention, rehabilitation, financial counseling, and mental health treatment services as defined by the department of health and human services. The term “gambling disorder” means a chronic, progressive disease that is characterized by a preoccupation with gambling, loss of control over gambling behaviors, and oftentimes disregard for the negative consequences as a result of gambling. Gambling disorder includes gambling behavior that compromises, disrupts, or damages personal, family, or vocational pursuits.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 460, § 2; 2001, ch. 421, § 1; 2017, ch. 352, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 391, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-22.
Gambling disorder prevention and treatment fund — Continuing appropriation.

Funds deposited in the gambling disorder prevention and treatment fund under section 53-12.1-09 are appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for the purpose of providing the services under section 50-06-21.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 454, § 1; 2005, ch. 470, § 2; 2017, ch. 352, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

50-06-23.
Placement of children — Least restrictive care. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 409, § 2; 2017, ch. 331, § 9, effective August 1, 2017; repealed by 2017, ch. 353, § 10, effective August 1, 2017.

50-06-24.
Guardianship services. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services may create and coordinate a unified system for the provision of guardianship services to vulnerable adults who are ineligible for developmental disabilities program management services. The system must include a base unit funding level at the same level as developmental disability corporate guardianship rates, provider standards, staff competency requirements, and guidelines and training for guardians. The department shall adopt rules for guardianship services to vulnerable adults which are consistent with chapters 30.1-26, 30.1-28, and 30.1-29.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 410, § 1; 2007, ch. 39, § 21; 2017, ch. 331, § 10, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 21 of chapter 39, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

50-06-24.
Guardianship services. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department may create and coordinate a unified system for the provision of guardianship services to vulnerable adults who are ineligible for developmental disabilities program management services. The system must include a base unit funding level at the same level as developmental disability corporate guardianship rates, provider standards, staff competency requirements, and guidelines and training for guardians. The department shall adopt rules for guardianship services to vulnerable adults which are consistent with chapters 30.1-26, 30.1-28, and 30.1-29.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 410, § 1; 2007, ch. 39, § 21; 2017, ch. 331, § 10, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 392, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-25.
Biennial report on programs and services. [Expired]

Expired under S.L. 2005, ch. 411, § 3.

50-06-26.
Alternatives-to-abortion services program. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services shall disburse funds available through title IV-A of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 601 et seq.] to nongovernmental entities that provide alternatives-to-abortion services and expend funds to inform the public about this program. The services must be outcome-based with positive outcome-based results. The department, in consultation with a nongovernmental entity that provides alternatives-to-abortion services, shall contract to inform the public about this program. For purposes of this section, “alternatives-to-abortion services” are those services that promote childbirth instead of abortion by providing information, counseling, and support services that assist pregnant women or women who believe they may be pregnant to choose childbirth and to make informed decisions regarding the choice of adoption or parenting with respect to their children.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 412, § 1; 2007, ch. 414, § 1; 2009, ch. 412, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 412, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 414, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

50-06-26.
Alternatives-to-abortion services program. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department shall disburse funds available through title IV-A of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 601 et seq.] to nongovernmental entities that provide alternatives-to-abortion services and expend funds to inform the public about this program. The services must be outcome-based with positive outcome-based results. The department, in consultation with a nongovernmental entity that provides alternatives-to-abortion services, shall contract to inform the public about this program. For purposes of this section, “alternatives-to-abortion services” are those services that promote childbirth instead of abortion by providing information, counseling, and support services that assist pregnant women or women who believe they may be pregnant to choose childbirth and to make informed decisions regarding the choice of adoption or parenting with respect to their children.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 412, § 1; 2007, ch. 414, § 1; 2009, ch. 412, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 393, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-27.
Prescription drug monitoring program. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 212, § 2.

Note.

For prescription drug monitoring program, see now N.D.C.C., ch. 19-03.5.

50-06-28.
Substance abuse treatment pilot program. [Expired]

Expired under S.L. 2005, ch. 414, § 4.

50-06-29.
Application for aging and disability resource center funding. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services shall operate an aging and disability resource center for the state. The resource center will be a single point of information program at the community level which will help people make informed decisions about the full range of long-term care service and support options, including both institutional and home and community-based care, and which will provide unbiased information and assistance to individuals needing either public or private resources, to professionals seeking assistance on behalf of their clients, and to individuals planning for their future long-term care needs. The resource center must be free from a conflict of interest which would inappropriately influence or bias the actions of a contractor, staff member, board member, or volunteer of the resource center to limit the information given to a consumer to steer the consumer to services that may also be provided by the resource center.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 415, § 1; 2017, ch. 331, § 11, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

This section became effective April 10, 2007, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 3 of chapter 415, S.L. 2007.

50-06-29.
Application for aging and disability resource center funding. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department shall operate an aging and disability resource center for the state. The resource center will be a single point of information program at the community level which will help people make informed decisions about the full range of long-term care service and support options, including both institutional and home and community-based care, and which will provide unbiased information and assistance to individuals needing either public or private resources, to professionals seeking assistance on behalf of their clients, and to individuals planning for their future long-term care needs. The resource center must be free from a conflict of interest which would inappropriately influence or bias the actions of a contractor, staff member, board member, or volunteer of the resource center to limit the information given to a consumer to steer the consumer to services that may also be provided by the resource center.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 415, § 1; 2017, ch. 331, § 11, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 394, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-30.
Interagency agreement between the department of human services and the department of corrections and rehabilitation. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The executive director of the department of human services and the director of the department of corrections and rehabilitation may amend the interagency agreement entered under this section which became effective August 1, 2007. The amended agreement must provide that the department of corrections and rehabilitation shall train, consult, and assist the department of human services with the provision and enforcement of safety and security procedures at the state hospital for all patients at the state hospital, including those committed to the state hospital under chapter 25-03.1 or placed at the state hospital for evaluation or civil commitment and treatment under chapter 25-03.3 and for all staff, visitors, and volunteers at the state hospital. The amended interagency agreement must provide that the executive director of the department of human services shall continue to be responsible for the custody and care of patients at the state hospital, including those committed to the state hospital under chapter 25-03.1 or placed at the state hospital for evaluation or civil commitment and treatment under chapter 25-03.3, including responsibility for all assessments, evaluations, and treatment required under chapter 25-03.3, the provision of all necessary staffing, including maintenance staff, and the provision of all daily care and health care.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 416, § 1; 2015, ch. 330, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 330, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 130, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

50-06-30.
Interagency agreement between the department of health and human services and the department of corrections and rehabilitation. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The executive director of the department and the director of the department of corrections and rehabilitation may amend the interagency agreement entered under this section which became effective August 1, 2007. The amended agreement must provide that the department of corrections and rehabilitation shall train, consult, and assist the department of health and human services with the provision and enforcement of safety and security procedures at the state hospital for all patients at the state hospital, including those committed to the state hospital under chapter 25-03.1 or placed at the state hospital for evaluation or civil commitment and treatment under chapter 25-03.3 and for all staff, visitors, and volunteers at the state hospital. The amended interagency agreement must provide that the executive director of the department shall continue to be responsible for the custody and care of patients at the state hospital, including those committed to the state hospital under chapter 25-03.1 or placed at the state hospital for evaluation or civil commitment and treatment under chapter 25-03.3, including responsibility for all assessments, evaluations, and treatment required under chapter 25-03.3, the provision of all necessary staffing, including maintenance staff, and the provision of all daily care and health care.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 416, § 1; 2015, ch. 330, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 395, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-31.
Report to legislative council — Individuals committed to state hospital. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Before March first of each even-numbered year, the department of human services shall report to the legislative council on services provided by the department of corrections and rehabilitation relating to individuals at the state hospital who have been committed to the care and custody of the executive director of the department of human services.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 416, § 2.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 130, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

50-06-31.
Report to legislative council — Individuals committed to state hospital. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Before March first of each even-numbered year, the department shall report to the legislative council on services provided by the department of corrections and rehabilitation relating to individuals at the state hospital who have been committed to the care and custody of the executive director of the department.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 416, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 396, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-32.
Autism spectrum disorder task force — Appointment — Duties — Annual reports. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The autism spectrum disorder task force consists of:

The state health officer, or the officer’s designee;

The director of the department of human services, or the director’s designee;

The superintendent of public instruction, or the superintendent’s designee; and

The executive director of the protection and advocacy project, or the director’s designee; and

The following members appointed by the governor:

A pediatrician with expertise in the area of autism spectrum disorder;

A psychologist with expertise in the area of autism spectrum disorder;

A college of education faculty member with expertise in the area of autism spectrum disorder;

A behavioral specialist;

A licensed teacher with expertise in the area of autism spectrum disorder;

An occupational therapist;

A representative of a health insurance company doing business in this state;

A representative of a licensed residential care facility that provides care and services to individuals with autism spectrum disorder;

A representative who is an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe;

An adult self advocate with autism spectrum disorder;

A parent of a child with autism spectrum disorder;

A family member of an adult with autism spectrum disorder; and

A member of the legislative assembly.

The director of the department of human services, or the director’s designee, shall serve as the chairman. The task force shall meet at the call of the chairman, at least quarterly.

The task force shall examine early intervention services, family support services that would enable an individual with autism spectrum disorder to remain in the least restrictive home-based or community setting, programs transitioning an individual with autism spectrum disorder from a school-based setting to adult day programs and workforce development programs, the cost of providing services, and the nature and extent of federal resources that can be directed to the provision of services for individuals with autism spectrum disorder.

The task force shall develop a state autism spectrum disorder plan and present the plan to the governor and the legislative council before July 1, 2010. Thereafter, the task force shall continue to review and periodically update or otherwise amend the state plan so that it best serves the needs of individuals with autism spectrum disorder. The task force shall provide an annual report to the governor and the legislative council regarding the status of the state autism spectrum disorder plan.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 413, § 1; 2017, ch. 351, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2009.

50-06-32.
Autism spectrum disorder task force — Appointment — Duties — Annual reports. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The autism spectrum disorder task force consists of:

The state health officer, or the officer’s designee;

The director of the department, or the director’s designee;

The superintendent of public instruction, or the superintendent’s designee; and

The executive director of the protection and advocacy project, or the director’s designee; and

The following members appointed by the governor:

A pediatrician with expertise in the area of autism spectrum disorder;

A psychologist with expertise in the area of autism spectrum disorder;

A college of education faculty member with expertise in the area of autism spectrum disorder;

A behavioral specialist;

A licensed teacher with expertise in the area of autism spectrum disorder;

An occupational therapist;

A representative of a health insurance company doing business in this state;

A representative of a licensed residential care facility that provides care and services to individuals with autism spectrum disorder;

A representative who is an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe;

An adult self advocate with autism spectrum disorder;

A parent of a child with autism spectrum disorder;

A family member of an adult with autism spectrum disorder; and

A member of the legislative assembly.

The director of the department, or the director’s designee, shall serve as the chairman. The task force shall meet at the call of the chairman, at least quarterly.

The task force shall examine early intervention services, family support services that would enable an individual with autism spectrum disorder to remain in the least restrictive home-based or community setting, programs transitioning an individual with autism spectrum disorder from a school-based setting to adult day programs and workforce development programs, the cost of providing services, and the nature and extent of federal resources that can be directed to the provision of services for individuals with autism spectrum disorder.

The task force shall develop a state autism spectrum disorder plan and present the plan to the governor and the legislative council before July 1, 2010. Thereafter, the task force shall continue to review and periodically update or otherwise amend the state plan so that it best serves the needs of individuals with autism spectrum disorder. The task force shall provide an annual report to the governor and the legislative council regarding the status of the state autism spectrum disorder plan.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 413, § 1; 2017, ch. 351, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 397, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-32.1.
Autism spectrum disorder voucher program pilot project — Legislative management report — Appeal. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services shall establish a voucher program pilot project beginning July 1, 2014, to assist in funding equipment and general educational needs related to autism spectrum disorder for individuals below two hundred percent of the federal poverty level from age three to under age eighteen who have been diagnosed with autism spectrum disorder. The program may include funding for assistive technology; video modeling videos or equipment; language-generating devices; training and educational material for parents; parenting education; sensory equipment; tutors; safety equipment; travel tools; self-care equipment; timers; visual representation systems; respite care; specialized day care; language comprehension equipment; and registration and related expenses for workshops and training to improve independent living skills, employment opportunities, and other executive or social skills.

The department shall adopt rules addressing management of this voucher program pilot project and establishing the eligibility requirements and exclusions for this voucher program pilot project. The program may not provide a voucher for early intensive behavioral intervention, including applied behavioral analysis, intensive early interventional behavioral therapy, intensive behavioral intervention, the Lovaas method, the Denver model, LEAP (learning experiences - an alternative program for preschoolers and parents), TEACCH (treatment and education of autistic and related communication handicapped children), pivotal response training, or discrete trial training.

A decision on a voucher application which is issued by the department under this section may be appealed as provided under chapter 28-32.

The department of human services shall report to the legislative management regarding the autism spectrum disorder program pilot project.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 206, § 2; 2015, ch. 46, § 13, effective July 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 398, effective September 1, 2022.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 13 of chapter 46, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

This section became effective July 1, 2013.